dicts/dsb/dsb.dic
alěry/N
aliry/N
Alpy/N
Antile/N
apel/K
Apeniny/N
artikel/K
Baal/K
Bahamy/N
banty/N
baseball/K
beryl/K
Beskidy/N
běźiś/M
Biskupice/I
bluejeanse/N
blumbaś/R
Błobošojce/I
Błota/N
błyšćiś/M
Bobolce/I
bobtail/K
Bólašojce/I
Bórkowy/I
Bósojce/I
bóśonojce/I
Bóžemysle/N
brabliś/M
bricadła/N
Brjazki/N
Brodkojce/I
broźiś/M
brucyś/S
brukaś/R
bubonaśiś/M
bundel/K
bužyś/S
bydliś/M
byrgele/N
bytšo/P
Čechy/N
cejźiś/M
cesaś/R
cesliś/M
cesto/P
chevalier/K
chłodno/P
chłoźiś/M
Chójany/I
chójźiś/M
chólowy/N
chrapje/N
chrośiś/M
chwaliś/M
chwjaśe/L
cockerspaniel/K
cybaś/R
cypel/K
cysto/P
dajiś/M
dakotaś/R
dalejwobstaśe/L
daloki/JW
depozity/I
dešć/K
dewotcionalije/N
dłužyś/S
dłymoki/JW
dobrozdaśe/L
Dobrynje/I
Dobryń/I
dojěś/O
dojśe/L
dolany/I
Dolomity/N
Domašojce/N
domkhyśe/L
dopokazaś/R
doprědkawuwiśe/L
dopśěsć/Q
dorosć/Q
dowlac/Q
dowol/K
drebotaś/R
drěśe/L
Drjejce/I
Drježdźany/I
drobno/P
Droganojce/I
drogo/P
drosćiś/M
dudy/N
dukliś/M
Dulojce/I
dušyś/S
efekty/N
eksil/K
ezel/K
fidle/N
fizimatenty/N
flanel/K
fresyś/S
frikasej/K
gasyś/S
gawdij/K
gibotaś/R
Gižkojce/I
gjarźiś/M
glucyś/S
gładcyś/S
gładki/JW
głosoliś/M
głosyś/S
głowuwiśe/L
gněśiś/M
gněźdźiś/M
gnurliś/M
Gołkojce/I
Goral/K
gódy/I
gójśe/L
góriny/N
Góry/I
góspozyś/S
grabaś/R
Grabice/I
grajośiś/M
grěšyś/S
grislymjadwjeź/K
grozyś/S
gryzaś/R
Guntarojce/I
gusćiś/M
gusto/P
hamry/N
Harnišojce/I
Hartmanojce/I
Hermanecy/I
hokej/K
Hórnikecy/I
hynacejbyśe/L
integral/K
jadnośiś/M
Janšojce/I
jatšy/I
Jeleńce/I
jesćija/N
jěsno/P
jěś/O
jězdźiś/M
jogi/K
juwel/K
kafejpiśe/L
Kałkojce/I
Kamjena/I
kamzoł/K
kapotaś/R
karbol/K
Karpaty/N
kašmej/K
kawliś/M
kazyś/S
Kerkojce/I
kimjel/K
kjachliś/M
kjagotaś/R
kjandrozyś/S
Klěśišća/I
kłasć/Q
knabotaś/R
kněža/N
kněžyś/S
kolonialist/K
konserwatorij/K
Kordillery/N
kóńcyś/S
kórtowanje/L
Kósmejce/I
Kóšnojce/I
Kósojce/I
kóšyś/S
kótły/N
kózliś/M
kraj/K
kringliś/M
kristale/K
krjuzyś/S
krotcyś/S
krotki/JW
kružyś/S
kšocyś/S
kšyśe/L
kśějkotaś/R
kśicyś/S
Kśimnice/I
kśiwźiś/M
kulij/K
kwisć/Q
kwjerlowańce/N
lakaj/K
lapotaś/R
Lědy/IN
Lěšće/N
Lěźiny/I
Libanojce/I
Libice/I
licyś/S
lokal/K
Lubolce/I
lubo/P
lubosćiś/M
luźiska/N
łaskośiś/M
ławkotaś/R
łazyś/S
łojśe/L
łužyś/S
łyšć/K
Malediwy/N
malsno/P
marsluź/K
Matyjojce/I
měkcyś/S
mergel/K
měsyś/S
miksedgrill/K
Milcany/N
mjazypśispomnjeśe/L
młośiś/M
množyś/S
mobil/K
mokšo/P
Mongol/K
móc/xQ
mórźiś/M
mrocyś/S
Mułkojce/I
muzej/K
mykotaś/R
mysliś/M
myśe/L
nadrobno/P
nagraśe/L
naklakotaś/R
nakłasć/Q
nalětniny/N
namazaś/R
napjac/Q
napněśe/L
napśěsć/Q
narjac/Q
narosć/Q
nasec/Q
našwikotaś/R
naturel/K
nawlac/Q
naźeśe/L
nicyś/S
Njabožkojce/I
njamóc/xQ
njebjesa/I
njeplecyś/S
njepóznaśe/L
njewugójśe/L
nokś/K
nosyś/S
nowolětka/N
nowonastaśe/L
nowo/P
Oriental/K
pakosćiś/M
pałkaś/R
pascal/K
pasiwa/N
pimpliś/M
pjac/aQ
pjenjeze/I
pjeršyś/S
plackotaś/R
Plejady/N
plojl/K
płošyś/S
pomsćiś/M
potencial/K
powdaśe/L
póchłodno/P
pócybaś/R
pódejśpiśe/L
pódjěś/O
pódkłasć/Q
pódkopy/N
pódrězaś/R
pódryśe/L
pódsec/Q
pódwoblac/Q
póhympaś/R
pójěś/O
pójmjeśe/L
pókłasć/Q
pópjac/Q
póšćabotaś/R
pósec/Q
pówarkotaś/R
pówopjac/Q
pówustaśe/L
prěcyś/S
projśe/L
prosyś/S
prošyś/S
prozniny/N
pšažyś/S
pšosto/P
pšosyś/S
pśedewześa/L
pśedkraj/K
pśedpódaśa/L
pśedumpaś/R
pśegnojśe/L
pśejěś/O
pśekłasć/Q
pśekrotki/JW
pśełamaś/R
pśepjac/Q
pśepodaśe/L
pśepomoc/Q
pśerosć/Q
pśěsć/Q
pśeskazaś/R
pśesušowaś/S
pśeśac/Q
pśewlac/Q
pśewoblac/Q
pśewześe/L
pśijaśeliś/M
pśijěś/O
pśilipaś/R
pśiłazyś/S
pśipjac/Q
pśipoznaśe/L
pśirězaś/R
pśirosć/Q
pśisypaś/R
pśiwoblac/Q
pśizajeśe/L
pusto/P
Rakece/I
rano/dP
realije/N
rědki/JW
regel/K
rěšyś/S
rězaś/R
rosć/Q
routinier/K
rozdłypaś/R
rozgrěśe/L
rozgriwaśiś/M
rozkwisć/Q
rozmazaś/R
rozrazyś/S
roztłuc/Q
rozwaliny/N
rozwězaś/R
rucyś/S
ryśe/L
sanje/N
sćakliś/M
šćěpaś/R
Sćiwojce/I
sebjewrota/N
sebjezaprěśe/L
sec/Q
Šenkojce/I
serail/K
skjaržyś/S
sklapaś/R
skoboźiś/M
škrjakotaś/R
skwisć/Q
słodcyś/S
słodki/JW
Słopišća/N
słośiś/M
słužyś/S
směšno/P
směšyś/S
smjerźiś/M
smjerź/K
sněgduśe/L
šnekotaś/R
sobuźěliś/M
spěšyś/S
spikese/N
spněśe/L
spóśiś/M
Šprjejcy/I
srěbotaś/R
srokopjel/K
stawizny/N
stłuc/Q
Stobrice/I
stuchło/P
sucho/P
šuflity/N
šukotaś/R
susedojce/I
sušyś/S
suźiś/M
šybliś/M
šyroki/JW
šyśe/L
śańki/WJ
śěžkometal/K
śicho/P
śopło/P
tajiś/M
tałužyś/S
tamaś/R
Tatry/N
tešno/P
tłuc/Q
tłusto/P
tocyś/S
trětoliś/M
tšašyś/S
tśakaś/R
tśepliś/M
Tśěšojce/I
tśmjel/K
tutkotaś/R
tužyś/S
twardo/P
tyśe/L
uniwersalije/N
wěšćiś/M
westibil/K
widlice/N
wjergliś/M
włocyś/S
wobjěś/O
wobkłasć/Q
wobkšyśe/L
wobłapaś/R
wobrosć/Q
wokwisć/Q
wopałkaś/R
wopóznaśe/L
wopśěsć/Q
wójěś/O
wóliś/M
wóstudno/P
wótbiśe/L
wótewześe/L
wótklatśkotaś/R
wótpśěsć/Q
wótrosć/Q
wótśapaś/R
wóttłuc/Q
wótwiśe/L
wrota/N
wudobyśe/L
wujěś/O
wukłasć/Q
wukopaś/R
wuměśe/L
wumjetliny/N
wupjac/Q
wupšoskotaś/R
wurjac/Q
wuscyś/S
wuseśe/L
wuslěc/Q
wusokośišć/K
wusta/I
wuwězaś/R
wuwześe/L
wuzdźiś/M
žadno/P
zadrěśe/L
zajěś/O
zakšyśe/L
zakwisć/Q
zalibotaś/R
žałosćiś/M
zamóc/Q
zapśikšyśe/L
zarosć/Q
zaškrjakotaś/R
Zaspy/N
zawdaźe/L
zawlac/Q
zeškrěśe/L
zeslěc/Q
zesukotaś/R
zjěś/O
złoźejice/I
zogoliś/M
zol/K
zrosć/Q
zryśe/L
žwałkotaś/R
žwangliś/M
žycyś/S
Źiwize/I
źiwno/P
źurja/N
